Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Reports

48-26-201. Financial statements for shareholders.

A corporation shall prepare annual financial statements, which may be consolidated or combined statements of the corporation and one (1) or more of its subsidiaries, as appropriate, that include a balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year, an income statement for that year, and a statement of changes in shareholders' equity for the year unless that information appears elsewhere in the financial statements. If financial statements are prepared for the corporation on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles, the annual financial statements must also be prepared on that basis. If requested in writing by any shareholder, the corporation shall furnish such statements to the shareholder as set out in subsection (c).

If the annual financial statements are reported upon by a public accountant, the public accountant's report must accompany them. If not, the statements must be accompanied by a statement of the president or the person responsible for the corporation's accounting records:

Stating the president's or other person's reasonable belief whether the statements were prepared on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles and, if not, describing the basis of preparation; and

Describing any respects in which the statements were not prepared on a basis of accounting consistent with the statements prepared for the preceding year.

A corporation shall mail the annual financial statements to each requesting shareholder within one (1) month after notice of the request; provided, that with respect to the financial statements for the most recently completed fiscal year, the statements shall be mailed to the shareholder within four (4) months after the close of the fiscal year.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 16.20.

48-26-202. Other reports to shareholders.

If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under § 48-18-502, § 48-18-503, § 48-18-504 or § 48-18-505 in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall report the indemnification or advance in writing to the shareholders with or before the notice of the next shareholders' meeting.

If a corporation issues or authorizes the issuance of shares for promissory notes or for promises to render services in the future, the corporation shall report in writing to the shareholders the number of shares authorized or issued, and the consideration received by the corporation, with or before the notice of the next shareholders' meeting.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 16.21.

48-26-203. Filing annual report with secretary of state.

Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an annual report that sets forth:

The name of the corporation and the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

The street address, including the zip code, of its registered office (and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the registered office), the county in which the office is located, and the name of its registered agent at that office in this state;

The street address, including the zip code, of its principal office (and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office);

The names and business addresses, including the zip code, of its directors and principal officers; and

The federal employer identification number (FEIN) of the corporation, or its corporation control number as assigned by the secretary of state.

Information in the annual report shall be current as of the date the annual report is executed on behalf of the corporation. An annual report of a domestic corporation that sets forth a change of the principal office of the domestic corporation shall be deemed to be an amendment to the charter of the domestic corporation, and the domestic corporation shall not be required to take any further action to amend the charter of the domestic corporation under chapter 20 of this title with respect to such amendment. An annual report of a foreign corporation that sets forth a change of the principal executive office of the foreign corporation shall be deemed to be an amendment to the certificate of authority of the foreign corporation, and the foreign corporation shall not be required to take any further action to amend the certificate of authority of the foreign corporation under § 48-25-104 with respect to such amendment. An annual report of a domestic or foreign corporation that sets forth a change of the registered office or registered agent of the domestic or foreign corporation shall be deemed to be a statement of change for purposes of §§ 48-15-102 and 48-25-108, respectively, and the domestic or foreign corporation shall not be required to take any further action under §§ 48-15-102 and 48-25-108, respectively, with respect to such change.

Every corporation shall file the annual report with the secretary of state on or before the first day of the fourth month following the close of the corporation's fiscal year, or upon a date set by rule by the secretary of state, if a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation.

State and national banks shall not be required to file annual reports pursuant to this section.

The secretary of state shall make a report to the commissioner of revenue, by the fifteenth day of each month, of any and all new corporations that have been licensed or authorized to operate in the state during the preceding month, giving the name and address of each new corporation, foreign or domestic.

The secretary of state shall furnish the commissioner of revenue, by the fifteenth day of each month, a list of all corporations that have surrendered their charters, have had their charters revoked, or have ceased to do business in the state during the preceding month.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 16.22; 1987, ch. 273, §§ 44, 45, 48; 1989, ch. 451, § 32; 1990, ch. 848, §§ 1, 2, 5; 1991, ch. 188, § 14; 2012, ch. 1051, §§ 57-60; 2014, ch. 783, §§ 7, 8; 2020, ch. 719, § 7.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “or upon a date set by rule by the secretary of state,” in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.